North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 6. Governor’s Advocacy Council on Children and Youth. [Repealed]

§§ 110-65,
110-66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 872, s. 7.

§§ 110-67 through 110-70.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 182.

§ 110-71.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 872, s. 7.

§ 110-72.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 182.

§§ 110-73 through 110-84.

Reserved for future codification purposes.